Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.030

Director's authority—Rules.

The director shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter.

(1) The director may adopt rules:

(a) Governing the loading, mixing, application and use, or prohibiting the loading, mixing, application, or use of any pesticide;

(b) Governing the time when, and the conditions under which restricted use pesticides shall or shall not be used in different areas as prescribed by the director in the state;

(c) Providing that any or all restricted use pesticides shall be purchased, possessed or used only under permit of the director and under the director's direct supervision in certain areas and/or under certain conditions or in certain quantities of concentrations; however, any person licensed to sell such pesticides may purchase and possess such pesticides without a permit;

(d) Establishing recordkeeping requirements for licensees, permittees, and certified applicators;

(e) Governing the fixing and collecting of examination fees;

(f) Fixing and collecting fees for recertification course sponsorship;

(g) Establishing testing procedures, licensing classifications, and requirements for licenses and permits, and criteria for assigning recertification credit to and procedures for department approval of courses as provided by this chapter;

(h) Concerning training by employers for employees who mix and load pesticides;

(i) Concerning minimum performance standards for spray boom and nozzles used in pesticide applications to minimize spray drift and establishing a list of approved spray nozzles that meet these standards; and

(j) Fixing and collecting permit fees.

(2) The director may adopt any other rules necessary to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter.

[ 2020 c 180 s 3; 1994 c 283 s 2; 1989 c 380 s 34; 1987 c 45 s 26; 1979 c 92 s 2; 1961 c 249 s 3.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1987 c 45: See notes following RCW 15.54.270.